Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8003
Claim; date of receipt; rebuttable presumption.

If a claim is submitted electronically, the claim is presumed to have been received on the date of the electronic verification of receipt by the insurer or the insurer's clearinghouse. If a claim is submitted by mail, the claim is presumed to have been received five business days after the claim has been placed in the United States mail with first-class postage prepaid. The presumption may be rebutted by sufficient evidence that the claim was received on another day or not received at all.

Laws 2005, LB 389, § 3.